New York, session 2025-2026, A9154.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "utility fair acquisition act". 3 § 2. Section 362 of the general municipal law, as amended by chapter 4 838 of the laws of 1945, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 362. Financing the cost of public utility service. 1. Any municipal 6 corporation may finance the cost of such public utility service in whole 7 or in part by levying taxes in the same manner as taxes are levied 8 pursuant to law for any permanent improvement by such municipal corpo- 9 ration, or the same may be financed in whole or in part pursuant to the 10 local finance law. 11 2. (a) In any acquisition by a municipal corporation of electric 12 generation, transmission or distribution infrastructure currently oper- 13 ated by a public utility company or private energy provider, the 14 appraised value shall be reduced by the proportional value of infras- 15 tructure that was financed through customer user fees, ratepayer 16 surcharges, or other non-investor-funded mechanisms, as determined by 17 the public service commission. 18 (b) The public service commission shall, upon request by a municipal 19 corporation seeking to acquire utility assets, determine the extent to 20 which such assets were financed through customer user fees, ratepayer 21 surcharges, or other non-investor-funded mechanisms, and shall issue a EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13499-03-6 A. 9154--A 2 1 report identifying the value of such contributions and recommending a 2 commensurate reduction in the acquisition price. 3 § 3. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new section 4 2859 to read as follows: 5 § 2859. Financing the cost of a public utility service. Notwithstand- 6 ing any other provisions of this title or the provisions of any general, 7 special or local law, any public benefit corporation created pursuant to 8 article five of this chapter which is authorized by law to produce, 9 develop, distribute and sell water, water services, facilities and 10 commodities shall have the power: 11 1. In any acquisition by a public utility corporation of generation, 12 transmission or distribution infrastructure currently operated by a 13 public utility company or private energy provider, the appraised value 14 shall be reduced by the proportional value of infrastructure that was 15 financed through customer user fees, ratepayer surcharges, or other 16 non-investor-funded mechanisms, as determined by the public service 17 commission. 18 2. The public service commission shall, upon request by a public util- 19 ity corporation seeking to acquire utility assets, determine the extent 20 to which such assets were financed through customer user fees, ratepayer 21 surcharges, or other non-investor-funded mechanisms, and shall issue a 22 report identifying the value of such contributions and recommending a 23 commensurate reduction in the acquisition price. 24 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.